Connecticut, session 2026, SB00104.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
surcharge on the net gain from the sale or exchange of capital assets on
a taxpayer, whose Connecticut adjusted gross income is equal to or
greater than the threshold amount specified in section 12-700 of the
general statutes for imposition of the highest and second highest
marginal rates on such taxpayer, of one per cent and seventy-five-
hundredths per cent, respectively.